Mississippi, session 2026, SB3385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Chapter 946, Local and Private Laws of 2022, is amended as follows: Section 1.  The Board of Supervisors of Marshall County, Mississippi, is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to contribute an amount not to exceed * * * One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) each fiscal year to the Byhalia Area Arts Council, a qualified charitable 501(c)(3) organization. Section 2.  This act shall be repealed from and after July 1, * * * 2026 2028. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.